California statutes. Insurance Code
(A) Review and make recommendations concerning any insurance settlement negotiation or offer relating to a Holocaust era insurance claim in which the department is involved.

(B) Review and make recommendations to the commissioner on the priorities for expenditure of funds and use of resources by the department for Holocaust era insurance claims-related activities.

(C) Recommend whether a proposed settlement of
 a Holocaust era insurance claim submitted to the committee pursuant to paragraph (7) is equitable before the department finalizes the settlement agreement.

(7) The commissioner, in the event of a proposed settlement of any policy or group of policies relating to Holocaust era insurance claims, shall confer with the committee prior to the department finalizing the settlement agreement. The department may not finalize a proposed settlement of a Holocaust era insurance claim unless the committee, pursuant to subparagraph (C) of paragraph (6), recommends that the proposed settlement is equitable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 50, Sec. 256.   (AB 378)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

12968.

(a) Every pleading issued by the commissioner to initiate a formal enforcement action under this code against a licensee or applicant, and every order issued by the commissioner or a court of competent jurisdiction or other document that resolves a formal enforcement action, shall be displayed on the department’s internet website, if the document is a public record that is not exempt from disclosure to the public pursuant to the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(b) Notwithstanding Section 12969, if an enforcement action against a licensee or applicant is withdrawn, then each pleading, document, or
 order against that licensee or applicant shall be removed from the department’s internet website within 30 days of the withdrawal of the action. If a pleading, document, or order contains allegations against multiple licensees or applicants, and the department withdraws all allegations against any one or more of the licensees or applicants, then the department shall post, on its internet website, a pleading, document, or order that clarifies that the enforcement action against that specific licensee or applicant has been withdrawn.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 317.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

12969.

An order or pleading posted on the department’s internet website that is related to a disciplinary proceeding or enforcement action under this code against a
 licensee or applicant, or that is related to a restricted license, shall be removed from the site 10 years from the date the disciplinary or enforcement action becomes final or, in actions resulting in the issuance of a restricted license, 10 years from the date the restriction on the license is removed. This section does not apply to an order or pleading related to an enforcement action resulting in a suspended or revoked license. This section is intended to apply solely to the department’s internet website and shall not be construed to require the department to permanently remove any information from its public record.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 201, Sec. 13.   (AB 1813)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Fees [12970. - 12980.]

12970.

The commissioner shall require the payment in advance of a fee for copying microfilm records in the amount of thirty cents ($0.30) per page.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 770, Sec. 27.5.)
-------------------------------------------

12970.1.

In addition to all other fees required for furnishing copies of instruments or documents filed in his office, the commissioner shall require the payment, in lawful money of the United States, of an amount approximately equal to the postage or other delivery charges he must pay for delivery of the copies so furnished if at the request of the person ordering them they are delivered by any more expensive means than ordinary first-class United States mail.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 542.)
-------------------------------------------

12972.

The commissioner shall require the payment of one dollar ($1), in advance, as a fee for attaching the commissioner’s seal of office to any paper or document not specified in this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 50, Sec. 257.   (AB 378)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

12973.

The commissioner shall require, in advance, as a fee for issuing certificates when the fee is not otherwise specified, the following amounts:

(a) Twenty-two dollars ($22), if there is sufficient demand so that the commissioner in the commissioner’s discretion has prepared a form of the certificate in advance that requires only the filling in of blanks for completion.

(b) For issuing any other certificate, the reasonable cost of preparing and issuing that certificate, but not to exceed fifty dollars ($50) for the first copy of the certificate and nine dollars ($9) for each additional copy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 50, Sec. 258.   (AB 378)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

12973.5.

The commissioner shall charge and collect, in advance, the following fees:

(a) For filing any application for a license, permit, or certificate of authority when a fee for either filing the application or issuing the license, permit, or certificate is not elsewhere specified in this code, twenty-two dollars ($22).

(b) For filing any application to take any qualifying examination required by this code to be taken by a licensee other than an insurer, or to be taken by any applicant for a license other than a certificate of authority when a fee for filing that application or giving that examination is not elsewhere specified in this code, seventy-two dollars
 ($72).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 534, Sec. 88.   (AB 1699)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

12973.6.

If a check in payment of a tax, fee, or penalty is not paid by the bank on which it is drawn on its first presentation, the commissioner shall charge and collect an additional fee of fourteen dollars ($14).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 534, Sec. 89.   (AB 1699)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

12973.7.

Where provision for fees or charges for documents, transcripts, or other materials which may be furnished by the commissioner is not specifically made in this code, the commissioner may fix and collect fees therefor not in excess of reasonable cost. All publications and other printed matter shall be distributed and sold by the Department of General Services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 371.)
-------------------------------------------

12973.9.

Whenever by the provisions of this code a form of policy or certificate and any endorsement, rider, application, amendment, fill-in material, classification of rates, certificate or premium to be used therewith, is required to be filed with, submitted to, or approved by the commissioner, fees as provided for by this section shall be paid to the commissioner to cover the expenses of processing and indexing the same and maintaining copies of the same.

The required fee shall be prescribed by the commissioner for each type document submitted, depending on its nature and the kind of processing required. The
 commissioner may prescribe different fees for different types of documents, and in the case of documents submitted for approval or authorization of use, shall prescribe a fee only for the final approval or authorization for use, if any. The commissioner shall determine the fee, or fees, by estimating in advance the commissioner’s total costs of performing these services for all types of documents for a specified period of time, estimating the total number of documents of various kinds which will be submitted for processing during such time and equitably distributing the total cost on a per document basis. The commissioner shall, after notice and hearing, promulgate such reasonable rules and regulations as are necessary to establish the standard or standards by which the commissioner shall determine the original fee schedule or any amended fee schedule. Any rule or regulation shall be promulgated in accordance with the procedure provided in Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3
 of Title 2 of the Government Code and shall be effective 90 days after adoption by the commissioner, except the first fee schedule adopted by the commissioner under such regulation may be retroactive to the effective date of this section.

All fees received by the commissioner under this section shall be remitted to the credit of the Insurance Fund pursuant to the provisions of Section 12975.7. 

Without in any manner affecting the applicability of this section to any other provisions of this code, it is expressly provided herein that the provisions of this section apply to the forms required to be filed, submitted, or approved under the following sections of this code: 779.8, 795.5, 1320, 9080.1, 10205, 10225, 10270, 10270.1, 10270.5, 10270.57, 10270.9, 10270.93, 10290, 10292, 10506, 11027, 11029, 11066, 11069, 11513, 11522, 11658, 12250, and 12640.18.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 714, Sec. 312.)
-------------------------------------------

12975.

Whenever, by the provisions of this code a duty, right, privilege, or power is imposed or conferred upon the commissioner, but it is provided that the expense of performance of that duty or exercise of that right, privilege, or power is to be paid in advance or otherwise out of sources other than the Insurance Fund, the commissioner may defray that expense, or any portion thereof, out of the appropriation for the support of the Department of Insurance without regard to prospect of repayment. The repayment of those moneys, not to exceed one thousand one hundred twenty-one dollars ($1,121) shall be a debt of and a lien against the assets of every person otherwise chargeable with that payment and shall constitute a preferred claim in all proceedings in bankruptcy or insolvency to the same extent as claims for
 compensation due employees for wages and salaries and claims for expenses of conservatorship or liquidation in proceedings under Article 14 (commencing with Section 1010) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 534, Sec. 90.   (AB 1699)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

12975.1.

All examination expense moneys collected by the Department of Insurance under the provisions of Sections 736, 1061, and 1857.4 are hereby appropriated to the department and shall be deposited in the Insurance Fund to the credit of the support appropriation for the department current at the time of the deposit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 722, Sec. 1.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 12 of Ch. 722.   Note: Stats. 1988, Ch. 855, deleted the July 1, 1989, termination date in Stats. 1982, Ch. 722, Sec. 10, as amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 770, Sec. 34.)
-------------------------------------------

12975.5.

The commissioner may, in any investigation or hearing the commissioner conducts, take or cause to be taken the deposition of any witness residing within or without this state and may pay the expense thereof out of the current support appropriation of the department. The commissioner may pay out of the appropriation to any witness subpoenaed by the commissioner the necessary and reasonable traveling expenses of any witness, to the place of hearing or investigation and return and a per diem of twelve dollars ($12) for each day that the witness is in attendance at or en route to and from the place of hearing or investigation in obedience to the subpoena. The provisions of this section shall not apply to proceedings conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of
 Title 2 of the Government Code, and those proceedings shall be governed solely by that chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 50, Sec. 259.   (AB 378)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

12975.7.

(a) All moneys received by the commissioner in payment of lawful fees or reimbursements pursuant to this code shall be transmitted to the Treasurer to be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the Insurance Fund. Unless specified in this code to be deposited in a different fund, all moneys received by the commissioner in fines, penalties, assessments, costs, or other sanctions shall be transmitted to the State Treasury for deposit in the General Fund.

(b) The money
 in the Insurance Fund received from the commissioner pursuant to this section is hereby appropriated to pay the refunds authorized by this code.

(c) The balance of the money in the Insurance Fund shall be used for the purposes specified in Section 12975.9, for the support of the Department of Insurance as authorized by the Budget Act, and for related cashflow needs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 251.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

12975.8.

(a) The Insurance Fund shall, in addition to the funds specified in Section 12975.7, consist of all of the following:

(1) All moneys appropriated to the fund in accordance with law.

(2) All moneys deposited into the State Treasury from any source whatever in payment of lawful fees or reimbursements collected by the Department of Insurance.

(3) The
 balance remaining in the Insurance Fund at the end of the fiscal year, whether the moneys received are from an appropriation, fees, or from reimbursements for services rendered.

(b) (1) All moneys in the Insurance Fund credited to the Seismic Safety Account shall be subject to an annual appropriation each fiscal year for the purposes specified in Section 12975.9.

(2) All other moneys in the Insurance Fund shall be subject to an annual appropriation each fiscal year for the support of the Department of Insurance.

(3) If the current cash balance in the Seismic Safety Account is not adequate to fund the amount appropriated from it in the annual Budget Act, the Insurance Fund, upon enactment of the Budget Act, shall loan to the account the amount of the appropriation, and one half of this amount
 shall be transferred to the Seismic Safety Commission. The second half of the appropriated amount shall be transferred to the Seismic Safety Commission from the Seismic Safety Account on or before December 31 of each year. This loan shall be repaid by revenues collected pursuant to Section 12975.9.

(c) Any balance remaining in the Insurance Fund at the end of the fiscal year may be carried forward to the next succeeding fiscal year.

(d) Whenever the balance in the Insurance Fund is not sufficient to cover cashflow in the payment of authorized expenditures, the department may borrow funds as may be necessary from whatever source and under terms and conditions as may be determined by the Director of Finance. Repayment shall be made from revenues received by the department for the same fiscal year for which the loan is made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 252.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

12975.9.

(a) The Seismic Safety Account is hereby created as a special account within the Insurance Fund. Moneys in the account are available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for the purposes of this section to fund the department and the Alfred E. Alquist Seismic Safety Commission.

(b) There is hereby imposed an assessment on each person who owns real property, commercial or residential, that is insured by a property insurance policy. The department shall calculate the annual assessment to be charged to each commercial and residential earned property exposure. The assessment shall be set annually every August 1, beginning August 1, 2014, for all commercial and residential earned property exposures reported during the
 previous calendar year. The annual assessment shall be set at fifteen cents ($0.15) per earned property exposure for the first three years of the implementation of this section. Each year thereafter, the annual assessment shall be based upon the number of earned property exposures from both commercial and residential insurance policies, the amount required for the support of the Alfred E. Alquist Seismic Safety Commission, the actual collection and administrative costs of the department, and the maintenance of an adequate reserve, but shall not exceed fifteen cents ($0.15) per earned property exposure.

(c) The insurer, upon receipt of an invoice from the department, shall transmit payment to the department for deposit into the Seismic Safety Account. The insurer shall recover the assessment from the insured, unless the insurer elects to pay the assessment on the insured’s behalf. The insurer may provide a description of the assessment to the
 insured as part of its billing statement. The insurer is not required to refund any portion of an assessment because the policy or coverage is terminated prior to the expiration date of the policy or coverage. Any deficiency or excess in the amount collected in relation to the appropriation authority for the commission and the department shall be accounted for in the subsequent annual fee calculation. Any balance remaining in the Seismic Safety Account at the end of each fiscal year shall be retained in the account and carried forward to the next fiscal year.

(d) Funds in the Seismic Safety Account shall be distributed, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the Alfred E. Alquist Seismic Safety Commission for the support of the commission and to the department for the actual administrative costs incurred in collecting the assessments.

(e) Any assessment collected from an
 insured that has not been remitted to the department shall be a debt owed to the state by the insurer. This part does not impose any obligation upon an insurer to take any legal action to enforce the collection of the assessment imposed by this section.

(f) Payment of the assessment shall be considered delinquent if not paid within 45 days of the invoice date. The department is authorized to charge a late fee of 1.5 percent per month of the balance due, compounded monthly, for any amount not paid within this period in accordance with Section 12995.

(g) (1) Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, the department shall report by December 1 of each year, beginning on December 1, 2014, to the Legislature, the Alfred E. Alquist Seismic Safety Commission, and the Department of Finance on the assessment calculation methodology employed.

(2) A report to be submitted to the Legislature pursuant to this subdivision shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 407, Sec. 2.   (AB 1395)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

12976.

All fines, forfeitures, taxes, assessments, restitution, and penalties provided for in this code shall be due and payable on the demand of the commissioner. If payment is not made within 10 days after that demand, then the commissioner shall institute an action in the name of the people of the State of California for the purpose of recovering that moneys due. All such actions shall be subject to all the provisions of the Code of Civil Procedure which may be applicable thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 540, Sec. 3.   (SB 1040)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

12976.5.

(a) On and after January 1, 1994, and before January 1, 1995, every insurer whose annual taxes exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) shall make payment by electronic funds transfer. On and after January 1, 1995, every insurer whose annual taxes exceed twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) shall make payment by electronic funds transfer. The insurer shall choose one of the acceptable methods described in Section 45 for completing the electronic funds transfer.

(b) Payment is
 deemed complete on the date the electronic funds transfer is initiated, if settlement to the state’s demand account occurs on or before the banking day following the date the transfer is initiated. If settlement to the state’s demand account does not occur on or before the banking day following the date the transfer is initiated, payment is deemed to occur on the date settlement occurs.

(c) (1) Any insurer required to remit taxes by electronic funds transfer pursuant to this section who remits those taxes by means other than an appropriate electronic funds transfer, shall be assessed a penalty in an amount equal to 10 percent of the taxes due at the time of the payment.

(2) If the department finds that an insurer’s failure to make payment by an appropriate electronic funds transfer in accordance with subdivision (a) is due to reasonable cause or circumstances
 beyond the insurer’s control, and occurred notwithstanding the exercise of ordinary care and in the absence of willful neglect, that insurer shall be relieved of the penalty provided in paragraph (1).

(3) Any insurer seeking to be relieved of the penalty provided in paragraph (1) shall file with the department a statement under penalty of perjury setting forth the facts upon which the claim for relief is based.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 721, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

12977.

The commissioner may authorize the refund of money received or collected by the department in payment for the filing of applications for licenses, permits or certificates, or for the rendering of other services:

(a) Where the receipt or collection has resulted in an overpayment or duplicate payment.

(b) In cases where no payment is required for filing the application for the license, permit or certificate sought, or for rendering the other service.

(c) Where an insufficient fee is
 paid and for which reason the application for the license, permit or certificate cannot be filed or the other service cannot be rendered.

(d) The penalty fee required by subdivision (b) of Section 1718 upon a written showing, filed within sixty (60) days after the delinquency date, with particularity as to facts that late payment resulted from mistake, inadvertence or excusable neglect.

This section does not exclude the making of refunds under other appropriate provisions of law requiring the approval of the Director of General Services before such refunds may be made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 371.)
-------------------------------------------

12978.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the commissioner may increase or decrease the fees set forth in this code, as necessary, to allow the department to meet the appropriation authorized by the annual Budget Act. However, any increase or decrease so made shall be made only in accordance with this section, and a fee increase shall not exceed 10 percent without the prior approval of the Legislature.

(b) A single annual increase or decrease in fees, on a fiscal year basis, may be made by the department at any time during the year provided it is announced by bulletin issued at least 90 days prior to the effective date of that increase or decrease. The bulletin shall be sent to all affected parties and to the Assembly Committee on
 Insurance and the Senate Committee on Insurance. That fee increase or decrease may be rescinded by a majority vote of both houses of the Legislature not later than 60 days after the issuance of the bulletin announcing the increase or decrease.

(c) If the bulletin is issued during the period between August 1 and December 1 of any year, the department shall provide notice in writing of the necessity of any fee increase or decrease as proposed in the bulletin upon issuance of the bulletin to the chairperson of the committee in each house that considers appropriations and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee.

(d) If written notice is provided to the commissioner within 60 days of the issuance of the bulletin announcing the increase or decrease by any of the chairpersons that there is an objection to the fee increase or decrease, the increase or decrease shall take
 effect February 1 of the following year unless rescinded by a majority vote of both houses of the Legislature by that date, rather than 60 days after issuance of the bulletin.

(e) The department shall annually project forward its workload for the subsequent three years in order to project appropriate fee levels, and shall annually make adjustments to those fees, if necessary, based on actual workload experience.

(f) The limit on the cumulative amount that the fees may be increased or decreased shall be the amount necessary to provide sufficient moneys to carry out the projected workload within the appropriations contained in the Governor’s Budget for the next succeeding fiscal year, or, to the extent that moneys received or projected to be received by the department are insufficient to carry out the projected workload within the appropriation authorized by the annual Budget Act
 during the then current fiscal year, an amount necessary to meet that appropriation and consistent with that projected workload.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 534, Sec. 91.   (AB 1699)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

12979.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 12978, the commissioner shall establish a schedule of filing fees to be paid by insurers to cover any administrative or operational costs arising from the provisions of Article 10 (commencing with Section 1861.01) of Chapter 9 of Part 2 of Division 1.

(History: Added November 8, 1988, by initiative Proposition 103, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

12980.

The Financial Responsibility Penalty Account is hereby created in the General Fund. Moneys in the account shall be expended, upon appropriation therefor, for matters including, but not limited to, automobile insurance and financial responsibility of vehicle owners and operators.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1494, Sec. 1.   Effective October 2, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Fee Oversight [12990. - 12995.]

12990.

The department shall adopt an accounting system, as recommended by the State Auditor in Report No. 93030, that will allow the department to accurately identify costs by the regulatory activities and to link the costs to fees collected for those regulatory activities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 965, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

12991.

On and after October 1, 1995, the department may not levy any fee or fees under Section 736 or 12979 unless the fees are created in compliance with Sections 12992 and 12993.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 965, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

12992.

(a) The department shall determine the actual cost of providing each examination as authorized under Section 730 and following. The department shall then set each fee levied under Section 736 to be based on the actual cost of providing the examination.

(b) The department shall determine the actual administrative and operational costs arising from the provisions of Article 10 (commencing with Section 1861.01) of Chapter 9 of Part 2 of Division 1. The department shall then set the fees assessed under Section 12979 to be based on the actual administrative and operational costs arising from the provisions of Article 10 (commencing with Section 1861.01) of Chapter 9 of Part 2 of Division 1.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 965, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

12993.

The department shall provide the schedule of fees created under Section 12992, as well as the justification that the fees are based on the actual cost of the regulatory activity, to the Department of Finance, the Legislative Analyst, and the insurance committees in each house of the Legislature.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 965, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

12994.

On or before October 1, 1995, the department shall publish a schedule of all fees levied under Sections 736 and 12979. The fees shall be calculated in accordance with Sections 12992 and 12993. On or before January 15, 1996, the Bureau of State Audits shall complete an audit of the schedule of fees created by this section. The audit shall determine if the fees are in compliance with Section 12992.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 965, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

12995.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, all uncontested departmental billings for services or assessments authorized herein, which are not paid within 45 days of the invoice date, shall be subject to a late charge, unless waived or modified by the department. The late charge shall be 112 percent per month of the balance due. This late charge shall be compounded monthly.

(b) Billings from the department shall be postmarked within five working days of the invoice date. If the billing is postmarked more than five working days after the invoice date, the insurer shall be given 45 days from the date of the postmark to pay the amount due. In those instances where a billing is postmarked more than five working days after the invoice date, the insurer is required to submit the postmarked envelope with payment to avoid a late charge.

(c) Payments shall be postmarked by the due date to avoid a late charge. Except as provided in subdivision (d), contested billings for which the original amount is paid to the department after the 45 day period shall be subject to the late charge, unless waived or modified by the department. The insurer shall provide written notice of the contested billing and shall set forth the basis for the contestability in writing to the department prior to the due date.

(d) Late charges shall be tolled for the portion of the billing that is contested by an insurer. The commissioner shall consider the material submitted by the insurer and reach a decision on the contested billing within 30 days of receiving written notification that a billing is being contested. The commissioner’s written decision on contested amounts shall be final and written notification, including a revised amount, if any, shall be provided indicating the basis for the decision. This written notification shall also include an invoice date from which an insurer shall be given 30 days to remit payment. This section shall not preclude an insurer from filing a petition for writ of mandate in accordance with the provisions of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(e) All late charges collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the General Fund.

(f) This section shall not apply to the Insurance Department Schedule of Fees and Charges pursuant to Section 12978.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 798, Sec. 4.   Effective October 9, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998, by Sec. 8 of Ch. 798.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Suspension of Privilege of Appearing or Practicing Before the Commissioner [13500. - 13505.]

13500.

The commissioner may deny, temporarily or permanently, the privilege of appearing or practicing before the department in any way to any person, other than an attorney acting in that capacity, who is found by the commissioner, after notice of and opportunity for hearing, to be subject to any of the following:

(a) The person does not possess the requisite qualifications to represent others.

(b) The person is lacking in character or integrity or has engaged in unethical or improper professional conduct.

(c) The person has willfully violated, or willfully aided and abetted the violation of any provision of this code, or the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1328, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

13501.

Any person whose license to practice as an accountant, actuary, or other expert has been revoked or suspended in any state, territory, district, commonwealth, or possession, or any person who has been convicted of a felony, or of a misdemeanor involving moral turpitude, shall be forthwith suspended from appearing or practicing before the commissioner. A suspension, revocation, or conviction within the meaning of this article shall be deemed to have occurred when the suspending, revoking, or convicting agency or tribunal enters its judgment or order, regardless of whether appeal is pending or could be taken, and includes a judgment or order on a plea of nolo contendere.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1328, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

13502.

(a) An application for reinstatement of a person permanently suspended or disqualified under Section 13500 may be made at any time, and the applicant may, in the commissioner’s discretion, be afforded a hearing. However, the suspension or disqualification shall continue unless and until the applicant has been reinstated by the commissioner for good cause shown.

(b) Any person suspended under Section 13501 shall be reinstated by the commissioner, upon appropriate application, if all the grounds for application of the provisions of Section 13501 are subsequently removed by a reversal of the conviction or termination of the suspension or revocation. An application for reinstatement on any other grounds by any person suspended under Section 13501 may be filed at any time and the applicant shall be afforded an opportunity for a hearing in the matter. However, the suspension shall continue unless and until the applicant has been reinstated by the commissioner for good cause shown.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1328, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

13503.

Any person appearing or practicing before the commissioner who has been the subject of an order, judgment, decree, or finding relevant to Section 13501 shall promptly file with the commissioner a copy thereof, together with any related opinion or statement of the agency or tribunal involved. Failure to make this filing shall not impair the operation of any other provision of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1328, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

13504.

Any proceeding brought under any section of this article shall not preclude a proceeding under any other section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1328, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

13505.

All hearings held under this article shall be closed to the public, unless the commissioner on the commissioner’s own motion, or at the request of a party, otherwise directs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 50, Sec. 260.   (AB 378)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Insurance Payment Intercept Program [13550. - 13555.]

13550.

(a) An insurer shall cooperate with the Department of Child Support Services to identify claimants who are also obligors who owe past-due child support and report those claimants to the Department of Child Support Services.

(b) An insurer shall identify and report a claimant to the Department of Child Support Services if the claim seeks an economic benefit for an obligor who owes past-due child support.

(1) An “economic benefit” under a life insurance policy, disability income insurance policy, or annuity means a payment totaling at least one thousand dollars ($1,000) in which an individual is paid as the payee or copayee for any of the following:

(A) A claim by a beneficiary under a life insurance policy.

(B) A payment of the cash surrender value of a life insurance policy or annuity.

(C) A payment to an annuitant.

(D) A payment from a disability income insurance policy.

(E) A loan against the cash value or surrender value of an insurance policy or annuity, excluding loans for premium payments.

(2) An “economic benefit” under a property and casualty insurance policy means a payment totaling at least one thousand dollars ($1,000) under a liability insurance policy or underinsured motorist policy issued by an insurance company authorized to do business in this state. An “economic benefit” under a property and casualty
 insurance policy does not include payments to replace or repair lost or damaged property.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), and except as provided in subdivision (h), a claimant with any of following economic benefits shall not be reported:

(1) Payments resulting from an accelerated death benefit.

(2) A claim for benefits assigned to be paid to a health care provider or facility for actual medical expenses owed by the insured that are not otherwise paid or reimbursed, or a payment made after the claimant provides proof of the amount actually paid by the claimant to a health care provider if the amount is at least as much as the insurance payment, but not any amounts billed but not paid.

(3) A claim for benefits to be paid under a limited benefit
 insurance policy that provides one of the following:

(A) Coverage for one or more specified diseases or illnesses.

(B) Dental or vision benefits.

(C) Hospital indemnity or other fixed indemnity coverage.

(D) Accident only coverage.

(4) A claim for benefits that are the result of a state of emergency, as defined in Section 8558 of the Government Code.

(5) A claim for benefits under a workers’ compensation policy, except as provided in Section 17510 of the Family Code and Section 138.5 of the Labor Code.

(d) An insurer in California subject to the requirements of
 this article shall identify and report a claimant to the Department of Child Support Services if either of the following apply:

(1) A payment is made to the owner of a life policy or annuity that was issued to the owner while residing or located in California.

(2) A beneficiary making a claim resides or is located in California.

(e) Withholding from a qualifying disability insurance payment made to an obligor who owes past-due child support shall be limited to 50 percent of the claim for benefits.

(f) (1) If an insurer identifies a claimant as an obligor who owes past-due child support and reports the claimant to the Department of Child Support Services, the Department of Child Support Services shall provide the insurer with either
 of the following to secure the payment of the amount of past-due child support:

(A) A notice of child support lien.

(B) An income-withholding order.

(2) Upon receiving notice from the Department of Child Support Services that a reported insurance claim is payable to an obligor with a child support delinquency, an insurer shall comply with the requirements of the notice.

(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (2), this section does not require an insurer to comply with a notice from the Department of Child Support Services on a reported insurance claim payable to an obligor with a child support delinquency if the notice is received after the insurer has paid the claim.

(g) For the purposes of this
 section, “insurer” includes a fraternal benefit society.
